North Carolina, session 2025, HB1212.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 47C-3-102 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47C-3-102. Powers of unit owners' association.
…
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the association may not impose limitations on unit
owners' ability to install, maintain, and use solar panels as a power source."
SECTION 2. G.S. 47F-3-102 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47F-3-102. Powers of owners' association.
(a) Unless the articles of incorporation or the declaration expressly provides to the
contrary, the association may do all of the following:
…
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the association may not impose limitations on lot
owners' ability to install, maintain, and use the following:
(1) Solar panels as a power source.
(2) Edible or pollinator gardens located within a lot owners' boundaries.
(3) Accessory dwelling units that meet applicable building and environmental
codes that are also allowed by zoning restrictions."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for education on these provisions.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1212-v-1*